Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.019

Counting center.

"Counting center" means the facility or facilities designated by the county auditor to count and canvass ballots.

[ 2011 c 10 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 104. Prior: 1999 c 158 s 1; 1990 c 59 s 4. Formerly RCW 29.01.042.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.